Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4103
Insurer, defined.

Insurer shall mean any insurance company as defined in section 44-103, fraternal benefit society as described in section 44-1072, prepaid dental service plan as defined in section 44-3802, or health maintenance organization as defined in section 44-32,105 authorized to transact health insurance business in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 265;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 100.